Illinois, session 104th, HB2133.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 77-5 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/77-5)7    Sec. 77-5. Election; powers and duties. The The township 8assessor shall be elected and have powers and duties as 9provided in the Property Tax Code. The township assessor also 10shall be a member of the board of health for a public health 11district as provided in the Public Health District Act.12(Source: P.A. 88-62; 88-670, eff. 12-2-94.)